Hawaii statutes.
[§198-6] Construction. This chapter
shall not be construed to imply that any easement, covenant, condition, or
restriction which does not have the benefit of this chapter shall on account of
any provisions of this chapter be unenforceable. Nothing in this chapter shall
diminish the powers granted by any general or special law to acquire, by
purchase, gift, eminent domain, or otherwise, and to use land for public
purposes. [L 1985, c 149, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next